Illinois, session 104th, HB5267.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Section 9-152 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/9-152 new)7    Sec. 9-152. Short-Term Rentals Assessed as Commercial 8Property. In counties with a population of 200,000 or more 9that classify property, any residential property used in whole 10or in part as a short-term rental accommodation for 30 or more 11days in any year shall be assessed on the same basis of 12assessment as commercial property.